unified/qu_EC.aff
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------
#
#    Shukllachiska Kichwa del Ecuador, hunspell format dictionary affix file
#    Copyright (C) 2009 Arno Teigseth, Henry David Lara
#
#    This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
#    it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
#    the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
#    (at your option) any later version.
#
#    This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#    GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
#
#    You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
#    along with this program. See LICENSE.txt. If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#    The author(s) can be contacted at arno at teigseth dot no
#
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# 

BREAK 1
BREAK -
# Allow checking of words on both sides of - : Mateo 10: 12-kama 16-tami will check 12 and kama separately

SET UTF-8
TRY akinuhstpmrclyoweñdbjgvzfqx

NOSUGGEST !   # Bad words, don't suggest them.

FORBIDDENWORD ¤  # Bad combinations.

COMPOUNDMIN 1 # Minimum length of compound words

COMPOUNDBEGIN /      # start comp, all words (except accented ones) in kichwa...
COMPOUNDMIDDLE -     # middle comp
COMPOUNDEND >        # end comp
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG + # allow (stem+affix)+compound
COMPOUNDFORBIDFLAG 1 # words not allowed in compounds, e.g. espíritu ok but not espírituka
                     # really redundant for the words with no / specified
ONLYINCOMPOUND x     # words allowed only in compounds, e.g. espíritu/ ok while forcing espiritu|ka = espiritu//x
COMPOUNDMORESUFFIXES # Allow 2-fold suffix PLUS compound (as in miku/chi|ku/nki+pash)

# Frequently switched character groups
REP 8
REP ai ay
REP gui ki
REP hua wa
REP j k
REP ng nk
REP qui ki
REP taj tak
REP iy y

# Frequently switched characters
MAP 6
MAP ie
MAP jk
MAP iy
MAP gk
MAP qk
MAP td

# VERBS
#
# are funny things.
#
# Let's try twofold suffix stripping to deal with the great flexibility of the Quichua verbs.
# There are [at least] two major branches of verbs, "common" and "pluralized"
#
# 1) The common conjugations are tagged with /v:
#   mikuna//v
#
# The tag /v gives "mood/direction/style" to the verb:
# miku|RA|na/c ; miku|CHI|na/c ; miku|CHIRA|na/c and so on. This is the first level.
# 
# The tag /c gives time+sex to the verb:
# miku|ra|NKI/+ ; miku|chi|RKANKI/+ ; miku|chira|RKANKICHIK/+ and so on. This is the second level (and hunspell's max for the moment).
#
# 2) The pluralizing inflex -na- is causing trouble because it comes BEFORE the "/v" tag suffixes, 
#      and is not compatible with all the "/c" variants.
#    The -na- means something like "do the verb amongst many"
#
# e.g. tanta|na|ku|nchik : -na- comes before ku, the "/v" variant, and nchik, the "/c" variant.
# e.g. tanta|na|ku|sha   : -na- comes before ku, the "/v" variant, and sha is incompatible with -na-
#
# So since the tags run the show linearly: "/v" -implies> "/c" -implies> "/+", 
#  all the variants under /v must be repeated under "/w". 
# Then we can repeat only the valid -na- combinations from "/c" to the new tag "/p".
#
# The tag /w gives "mood/direction/style" to the verb just like /v, but points to /p tag instead, and keeps the -na-:
# tantana|RA|na/p ; tantana|CHI|na/p ; tantana|CHIRA|na/p and so on. This is the first level.
#
# The tag /p gives time+sex to the verb, valid -na- combinations only:
# tantana|ku|NCHIK/+ ; tantana|chi|CHUN/+ ; tantana|CHIKU|nchik/+ and so on. This is the second level.
#
# -------------------------------------------
#
# The + is not a morph but a compound flag, to indicate that
#   miku|chira|RKANKICHIK/pash/chari  is an OK word, pash and chari being compounds.
#


# COMPOUNDS
#
# The order of the compounds could be checked with a grammar checker. 
# Hunspell does not allow repetition of compound words, so that helps a bit.
# (e.g.) mikuna/chari/chari is NOT ok.

# Rules syntax
# PFX/SFX flag stripchars(0 if none) affix condition-regex

# VERBS COMMON CONJUGATIONS common first level
SFX v Y 27
SFX v na na//+c na            # Stem/Infinitive common
SFX v na rina//+c na          # reflexive
SFX v na rimuna//+c na        # reflexive "arriving ~ing"
SFX v na riwana//+c na        # reflexive ~ in my favor
SFX v na richina//+c na       # reflexive "make ~"
SFX v na rikrina//+c na       # reflexive "going to ~"
SFX v na rikuna//+c na        # reflexive "constantly ~"
SFX v na krina//+c na         # "going to ~"
SFX v na rana//+c na          # "always ~"
SFX v na riyana//+c na        # "always ~"
SFX v na kuna//+c na          # "constantly ~"
SFX v na kumuna//+c na        # "constantly arriving doing ~"
SFX v na kumurina//+c na      # "constantly arriving doing ~ reflexive"
SFX v na kuchina//+c na       # "constantly make ~"
SFX v na kukrina//+c na       # "constantly going to ~"
SFX v na krikuna//+c na       # "constantly going to ~"
SFX v na muna//+c na          # "arriving ~ing"
SFX v na muwana//+c na        # "arriving ~ing in my favor"
SFX v na mukrina//+c na       # "going to arrive ~ing" 
SFX v na mukuna//+c na        # "constantly arriving ~ing"
SFX v na wana//+c na          # "doing ~ in my favor"
SFX v na china//+c na         # "make ~"
SFX v na chiwana//+c na       # "make ~ in my favor"
SFX v na chirina//+c na       # "make ~ for oneself"
SFX v na chikuna//+c na       # "constantly making ~"
SFX v na chikrina//+c na      # "going to make ~"
SFX v na chimuna//+c na       # "arriving making ~"
