unified/qu_EC.dic
achina//vw
adorana//vw
agradicina//vw
akllana//vw
aktuna//vw
alabana//vw
allawkanayana//vw
allichina//vw
allinayana//vw
allishunkuyana//vw
alliyana//vw
amina//vw
amintayana//vw
amkasyana//vw
amsayana//vw
amukyana//vw
anchuchina//r>,wv
anchuna//vw
animana//vw
ankasyana//vw
apamuna//vw
apanakuna//vwv
apiyana//vw
arina//vw
armarina//vw
ashayana//vw
ashnakyana//vw
ashtana//vw
asirina//vw
atina//vw
awllina//vw
ayudana//vw
ayunana//vwv
bautizana//vw
beneficiana//vw
cacharina//vw
cargana//vw
castigana//vw
chakatana//vw
chakmana//vw
chakruna//vw
challchunayana//vw
challinayana//vw
chamuknayana//vw
chanina//vw
chapuna//vw
charikyana//vw
charkina//vw
charkiyana//vw
chaskina//vw
chawana//vw
chawannayana//vw
chawayana//vw
chawchayana//vw
chawpinayana//vw
chawpiyana//vw
chayana//vw
chichunayana//vw
chikannayana//vw
chiknina//vw
chillpina//vw
chillpiyana//vw
chimpapuna//vw
chinina//vw
chinkana//vw
chirapana//vw
chiriyana//vw
chuchuna//vw
chukchuna//vw
chullanayana//vw
chullunayana//vw
chulunnayana//vw
chumpillina//vw
chunkanayana//vw
chunkullina//vwv
chunkuna//vwv
chununayana//vw
chupina//vw
churuna//vw
chushakyana//vw
chuskuyana//vw
chusuyana//vw
chuyakuna//vw
chuyayana//vw
contestana//vw
cuidana////vw
dedicana//vw
discretonayana//vw
divorciana//vw
encinayana//vw
esforzana//vw
fichuna//vwv
fichunayana//vw
fielnayana//vw
gratisnayana//vw
hillunayana//vw
humildenayana//vw
ikina//vw
ikiyana//vw
illakyana//vw
importana//vw
inkitana//vwv
intindina//vw
invitana//vw
irkinayana//vw
ishkaynayana//vw
ishkuna//vw
iskunnayana//vw
ismuna//vw
ismuyana//vw
jakannayana//vw
jakuna//vw
jamuknayana//vw
jamukyana//vw
jananiknayana//vw
japichina//vw
japinakuna//vwv
jarkana//vw
jatarina//vw
jatunyachina//vw
jatunyana//vw
jawayana//vw
jayaknayana//vw
jaytana//vw
jichuna//vw
juchachina//vw
juillunayana//vw
jukipuna//vw
jukunayana//vw
jumpina//vw
juramentuna//vw
jutkuna//vw
kachana//vw
kachiyachina//vw
kalimana//vw
kallpana//vw
kamarina//vw
kamina//vw
kanchisnayana//vw
kanina//vw
kantana//vw
kapakyana//vw
kapina//vw
karinayana//vw
karkanayana//vw
karkuna//vw
kasarana//vw
kasinayana//vw
kaspana//vw
kasuna//vw
katina//vw
kauchuna//vw
kawchuna//vw
kawpuna//vw
kawsarina//vw
kichkinayana//vw
kichuna//vw
kikinnayana//vw
killachina//vw
killayana//vw
killpana//vw
killuyana//vw
kimirina//vw
kimsayana//vw
kinkuchina//vw
kintiyana//vw
kishpichina//vw
kitanayana//vw
kiwina//vw
kuchuna//vw
kuchuyana//vw
kulluyana//vw
kulunyana//vw
kumurina//vw
kuna//vw
kunkuna//vw
kunukyana//vw
kurkunayana//vw
kururuna//vw
kushanina//vw
kushikuna//vwv
kushina//vw
kushiyana//vw
kushpana//vw
kuska//vw
kutichina//vw
kutina//r>+-,wv
kutsiyana//vw
kutunayana//vw
kuyachina//vw
kuynana//vw
kuyuna//vw
lampina//vw
lisiana//vwv
liyina//vw
llakirina//vw
llampuna//vw
llampuyana//vw
llashaknayana//vw
llashana//vw
llatannayana//vw
llatunana//vw
llikinayana//vw
llimpiknayana//vw
llimpiyaknayana//vw
llimpiyana//vw
lluchkana//vw
lluchkayana//vw
lluchunayana//vw
llukana//vw
llukinayana//vw
llukshichina//vwv
llukshina//vw
llullakyana//vw
llullunayana//vw
lluminayana//vw
llunchina//vw
llurana//vw
llutana//vw
lutsana//vw
makanakuna//vwv
makana//vw
mañachina//vw
manchana//vw
mandana//vw
mapayana//vw
mawkanayana//vw
mayanayana//vw
mayllana//vw
mayllayana//vw
mayoryana//vw
maywayana//vw
michina//vw
millana//vw
millayyana//vw
ministina//vw
minkana//vw
mirarana//vw
mishkichina//vw
mishkiyana//vw
mitsaknayana//vw
mitsana//vw
montonana//vwv
muchana//vw
mukuna//vw
munana//vw
muruchuyana//vw
mushuknayana//vw
muskuna//vw
muspanayana//vw
mutiyana//vw
mutkina//vw
muyuna//vw
ñakchana//vw
nanarina//vw
ñañuyana//vw
ñawpana//vw
nina//vw
nitkana//vw
ñutunayana//vw
nuyuna//vw
obligana//vw
pagana//vw
pakarimuna//vw
paktana//vw
paktayana//vw
pakuyana//vw
pampana//vw
pankallayana//vw
pantana//vw
pantayana//vw
parejana//vw
parlanakuna//vwv
pasana//vw
paskana//vw
patakyana//vw
pawana//vw
pezana//vwv
pichana//vw
pilluna//vwv
pimiyana//vw
piñanakuna//vwv
piñanayana//vw
pinkana//vw
pinkayana//vw
pishina//vw
pishkayana//vw
preocupana//vw
presochina//vwv
prezuna//vwv
puchukana//vw
pudina//vw
pukayana//vw
pukllanakuna//vwv
pukuna//vw
pulasyana//vw
punchayana//vw
puranayana//vw
purina//vw
purunyana//vw
pushkana//vw
pusunayana//vw
puyana//vw
puzuknayana//vw
quedana//vw
rantina//vw
rawmana//vw
rawrana//vw
respetana//vw
rezana//vwv
richakyana//vw
rikchakana//vw
rikcharina//vw
rikuchina//vw
rikunayana//vw
rina//vw
rsarkina//vw
rukuyana//vw
rupana//vw
rutuna//vw
sakirina//vw
sakranayana//vw
salvana//vw
sañinayana//vw
sankunayana//vw
santificana//vw
sapallayana//vw
sasirna//vw
satirina//vw
saunana//vwv
saytinayana//vw
sellana//vw
shalakananayana//vw
shamuna//vw
shayakyana//vw
shayarina//vw
shinana//v
shina//vw
shitana//vw
shuktakyana//vw
shulluna//vwv
shutichina//r>+-,wv
shutinayana//vw
shutuna//vw
shuyana//vw
shuyushkanayana//vw
sikana//vw
sinchiyana//vw
sintina//vw
sirana//vw
sirvina//vw
solonayana//vw
suchuna//vw
suchuyana//vw
suktanayana//vw
sumaknayana//vw
surkuna//vw
takana//vw
takllana//vw
tallina//vw
tamiyana//vw
tanikyana//vw
tantachina//vw
tantarina//vw
tantiyana//vwv
tapuna//vw
tarpuna//vw
tikllayana//vw
tikrachina//vw
timpuna//vw
tinkina//vw
tiyana//vw
trabajana//vw
tratana//vw
tsalanayana//vw
tsankana//vw
tsankayana//vw
tsantsayana//vw
tsikllayana//vw
tsirapana//vw
tsunkana//vw
tsuntsuyana//vw
tuktsana//vw
tukuna//vw
tulana//vw
tulluyana//vw
tupana//vw
tushuna//vw
uhuna//vw
ukiyana//vw
ukshana//vwv
ukunayana//vw
umana//vw
unayana//vw
unikillana//vw
upana//vw
upayana//vw
upyana//vw
urina//vwv
urinayana//vw
urmana//vw
usyana//vw
utkana//vw
uyansana//vw
viajana//vw
visitana//vw
wakana//vw
wakaysikinayana//vw
wakchanayana//vw
wakichina//vw
wakllishkanayana//vw
waktana//vw
wakuyana//vw
walutuyana//vw
waminsiyana//vw
wanana//vw
wañuchina//vw
warkuna//vw
washanyana//vw
washaykuna//vw
wasichina//vw
watukuna//vw
wayayana//vw
wayllanayana//vw
waynayana//vw
waytana//vw
wayunkana//vwv
wichina//vw
wichiyana//vw
wiksayuna//vwv
willana//vw
wiñachina//vw
wiranayana//vw
wishina//vw
wishturina//vw
yachachina//vw
yachana//vw
yallina//vw
yalliyana//vw
yanapana//vw
yanayana//vw
yantana//vw
yapana//vw
yarikana//vw
yaykuna//vw
yuraknayana//vw
yuyaknayana//vw
yuyana//vw
yuyayyana//vw
